Louisiana, session 2026, HB799.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:408(D)(1)(d) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§408. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
D.(1) The office of state fire marshal, code enforcement and building safety,
shall perform generally the functions of the state relating to the protection of life and
property from the hazards of fire and of panic which may arise from fire or from the
threat of fire or explosion, including but not necessarily restricted to:
* * *
(d) Exclusive power to investigate and to make and prescribe rules and
regulations for the proper construction, installation, repair, use, operation, and safety
of boilers in the state, the city of New Orleans excepted to license boiler inspectors,
and to issue general or special orders for the enforcement of such rules and
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
regulations as well as any provision of law affecting boilers. The rules and
regulations so formulated shall conform as nearly as practicable to the boiler
construction code of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers, all as specified
in R.S. 23:531 through 542 Subpart D-4 of Part III of Chapter 7 of Title 40 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
* * *
Section 2. Subpart D-4 of Part III of Chapter 7 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1664.21 through 1664.33, is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
SUBPART D-4. BOILERS
§1664.21. State fire marshal; authority to make rules; investigations
A. The state fire marshal has the exclusive power to investigate, and to
promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act, for the proper construction, installation, repair, use, operation, and safety of
boilers in this state and to issue orders for the enforcement of rules and regulations
as well as any provisions of law affecting boilers.
B. The rules and regulations shall conform to the boiler construction code
of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME). Boilers requiring
ASME Code stamping by the owner, user, or fabricator in shop or field fabrication,
assembly, modification, or repair shall be inspected in accordance with the ASME
Code and national board standards.
§1664.22. Duties of fire marshal
The fire marshal may do all of the following:
(1) Employ and compensate, with the approval of the governor, inspectors
and other assistants and employees as are necessary for the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties prescribed in this Subpart.
(2) Have free access to any premises in the state where a boiler is being
constructed, installed, or operated, for the purpose of investigating whether that
boiler is built, repaired, installed, or operated in accordance with the provisions of
this Subpart.
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
(3) Prosecute all violators of the provisions of this Subpart.
(4) Issue, suspend, or revoke installation permits for boilers and operating
certificates allowing boilers to be operated, as provided in this Subpart.
(5) Draw upon the state treasurer for funds necessary to meet any expense
authorized by this Subpart which, in addition to the salaries of employees, shall
include necessary traveling expenses and the expenses incident to the maintenance
of any offices required in the state.
(6) Enforce the laws governing the use of boilers and to enforce the rules and
regulations of the fire marshal.
(7) Keep a complete record of the type, dimensions, age, condition, pressure
allowed upon, location, and date of the last inspection of all boilers to which this
Subpart applies.
§1664.23. Licensed boiler inspectors
A. The fire marshal may license inspectors to inspect boilers in this state in
accordance with all of the following:
(1) The current edition of the National Board Inspection Code published by
the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.
(2) The current standards for Controls and Safety Devices for Automatically
Fired Boilers, also known as CSD-1, published by the American Society of
Mechanical Engineers (ASME).
(3) All applicable sections of the ASME codes.
B. A licensed inspector shall receive no salary from nor shall any of his
expenses be paid by the state except as provided in R.S. 40:1664.22(1). A licensed
inspector shall do all of the following:
(1) Hold an inservice inspector's commission from the National Board of
Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.
(2) Maintain employment with a company that is all of the following:
(a) Accredited by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel
Inspectors as an authorized inspection agency performing inservice inspection
activities as published in NB-369.
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
(b) Authorized by the fire marshal to inspect boilers in this state.
(3)(a) For an insured boiler, inspect that boiler within thirty days of the
expiration date on the operating certificate of that boiler, whether the inspector is
employed by or under contract with the insurance company.
(b) For an uninsured boiler, or for a boiler with an operating certificate that
has been expired for more than thirty days, that boiler may be inspected by any
licensed inspector in this state holding a current and valid inservice inspector's
commission from the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspector.
(4) Submit a report of every boiler inspection to the fire marshal within
fifteen calendar days from the date of the inspection, unless otherwise approved by
the fire marshal. Failure to submit the report within this time period may result in the
fire marshal's rejection of the report.
C. The fire marshal may do all of the following:
(1) Revoke an inspector's license for cause and only after an administrative
hearing.
(2) Promulgate rules and regulations through the Administrative Procedure
Act as may be deemed necessary for the implementation of the provisions of this
Section.
§1664.24. Inspection of boilers; periods; extensions
A. An external inspection of each power boiler or high-temperature, high-
pressure water boiler in this state shall be conducted annually by a licensed boiler
inspector while the boiler is under normal operating conditions, except as provided
in R.S. 40:1664.27.
B. An internal inspection of each power boiler or high-temperature, high-
pressure water boiler in this state shall be conducted annually by a licensed boiler
inspector, except as provided in R.S. 40:1664.27 or in this Subsection as follows:
(1)(a) A power boiler, the operation of which is an integral part of or
necessary adjunct to other continuous operations, shall be inspected internally and
issued operating certificates at intervals as are permitted by planned or scheduled
shutdown of the processing operation of five days or more in duration occurring after
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
three years have elapsed since the last inspection of the boiler, but not exceeding five
years between such intervals.
(b) A power boiler shall undergo at least one internal inspection before the
owner or operator may apply for a three to five year operating certificate extension.
(c) If the owner or operator of a power boiler submits a written and signed
statement to the fire marshal affirming that the boiler is an integral part of or
necessary adjunct to other continuous operations, the fire marshal may grant an
extension of the interval between internal inspections of that boiler up to a maximum
of five years.
(2) The fire marshal may extend the interval between internal inspections of
stationary boilers for a period not to exceed twenty-four months and issue an
operating certificate extension if the owner or operator of that boiler submits a
written and signed statement to the fire marshal affirming the following:
(a) Continuous water treatment under competent and experienced
supervision has been in effect since the last internal inspection for the purpose of
controlling and limiting corrosion and deposits.
(b) Accurate and complete records are available showing that since the last
internal inspection samples of boiler water have been taken at regular intervals not
greater than twenty-four hours of operation and that the water condition in the boiler
is satisfactorily controlled.
(c) Accurate and complete records are available showing the dates, if any,
that the boiler has been out of service and the reasons for the service disruption since
the last internal inspection, and such records shall include the nature of all repairs to
the boiler, the reasons for those repairs, and by whom the repairs were made.
(d) The last internal and current external inspection of the boiler indicates
the inspection period may be safely extended.
C.(1) Low-pressure boilers shall receive inspections in accordance with the
following schedule:
(a) Steam or vapor boilers shall have an external inspection and an internal
inspection every two years where construction permits.
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
(b) Hot water heating and hot water supply boilers shall have an external
inspection every two years and where construction permits, an internal inspection at
the discretion of the inspector.
(c) Potable water boilers shall have an external inspection every two years.
(2) Inspections shall include the functions of all controls and devices. If at
any time a hydrostatic test is deemed necessary to determine the safety of a boiler,
the test shall be made by a licensed inspector or at the discretion of the fire marshal.
§1664.25. Operating certificates; fees; issuance and suspension
A.(1) If, upon inspection, a boiler is found to be suitable and to conform to
the rules and regulations of the fire marshal, the fire marshal shall issue to the owner
or operator of that boiler an operating certificate specifying the maximum pressure
which the boiler may be allowed to carry.
(2) A one hundred fifty dollar fee shall be collected by the fire marshal for
the issuance or reinstatement of any operating certificate and for any extension of
internal inspection.
(3) The internal and external operating certificates shall be prominently
posted on the boiler or in the room containing the boiler.
B.(1) The fire marshal or a licensed inspector may suspend an operating
certificate if he reasonably believes the boiler for which it was issued cannot
continue to be operated safely or in accordance with the fire marshal's rules and
regulations. The suspension of an operating certificate shall continue in effect until
the boiler has been made to conform to the fire marshal's rules and regulations
regarding boilers and until the fire marshal has reinstated the operating certificate.
(2) If the fire marshal or a licensed inspector finds that a boiler is operating
unsafely or that the boiler constitutes an imminent hazard, the licensed inspector
shall immediately order the boiler to be shut down, and shall notify the fire marshal
of his findings within twenty-four hours. The shutdown shall be carried out in
accordance with applicable safety standards and established safe shutdown
procedures, and shall be consistent with documented operating and safety
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
procedures, including appropriate coordination, isolation of energy sources, and any
required internal or external notifications.
C. The operating certificate fee provided for in this Section is intended to
cover the cost of the issuance of those operating certificates and shall be retained and
disbursed by the fire marshal.
§1664.26. Operation of boiler without operating certificate; penalty
A. The operation of a boiler without an operating certificate or with a
suspended or expired operating certificate shall be penalized as follows:
(1) If the fire marshal or a licensed inspector finds that the owner has failed
to comply with the provisions of this Section, or receives a report from a licensed
inspector that a boiler is not in compliance with applicable safety standards, he shall
issue a written order to the boiler's owner or operator to have the boiler brought into
compliance with applicable safety standards and to have a satisfactory inspection
conducted before the boiler may be returned to operation.
(2) If the fire marshal finds that the owner has failed to comply with his
warning, the fire marshal shall issue a second order and may impose a fine of no
more than two hundred fifty dollars per day against the owner or operator for failure
to comply with this Section.
(3) The fire marshal may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement provisions of this Section.
B. Each day of unlawful operation shall constitute a separate offense.
§1664.27. Installation of boilers
No boiler shall be installed after six months following the date on which the
rules and regulations promulgated by the fire marshal governing new installations
become effective unless that boiler conforms to the newly-promulgated rules and
regulations.
§1664.28. Exemptions from provisions
A. The provisions of this Subpart shall not be construed as in any way
preventing the use or sale of boilers which have been installed or in use in this state
prior to July 7, 1938, and which have been made to conform to the rules and
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
regulations of the fire marshal governing existing installations, as provided in R.S.
40:1664.26.
B. The provisions of this Subpart are not applicable to any of the following:
(1) Boilers subject to inspection by any department or agency of the federal
government.
(2) Air tanks located on vehicles used for transporting passengers or freight.
(3) Boilers of steam fire engines brought into the state for temporary use in
times of emergency.
(4) Portable boilers used for agricultural purposes only.
(5) Steam heating boilers carrying not more than fifteen pounds pressure
used exclusively for noncommercial purposes located in any private home.
(6) Potable water boilers below one hundred twenty gallon capacity and less
than two hundred thousand BTUs (British Thermal Units).
(7) Hot water heating and supply boilers used exclusively for
noncommercial purposes located in any private home.
(8) Boilers located in any private home.
§1664.29. Fees for operating certificates
A. The owner or operator of a boiler required by this Subpart to be inspected
by a licensed inspector shall pay to the fire marshal a fee of one hundred fifty dollars
for every operating certificate.
B. Failure to pay operating certificate fees within thirty days following the
date of the inspection may subject the owner, operator, or person requesting the
special inspection to fines and penalties according to the fire marshal's rules and
regulations.
C. The fees for inspection provided for in this Section are intended to defray
the cost of employment of the office of state fire marshal and shall be retained and
disbursed by the fire marshal for this purpose.
D. The provisions of this Section do not apply to commercial potable-water
boilers of less than one hundred twenty gallons and two hundred thousand BTU
capacity.
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
§1664.30. Installation, moving, or reinstallation of power boilers, steam heating,
water supply, potable water, or hot water boilers; licensing; examination; fees
A. Any installation, moving, or reinstallation of power boilers, steam
heating, water supply, potable water, or hot water heating boilers in this state shall
be supervised by an installer licensed by the fire marshal to perform that work.
B. The initial fee for an installer license is one hundred dollars payable to
the fire marshal prior to issuance of that license. The annual renewal fee for an
installer's license is fifty dollars payable on or before January thirty-first of each
year.
C. Each person applying to be licensed for the installation, moving, or
reinstallation of power boilers, steam heating, water supply, potable water, or hot
water heating boilers shall obtain a score of seventy percent or more on an
examination administered by the fire marshal or his designated representative before
an installer license is issued by the fire marshal.
D. The fee for the installer's license examination is one hundred fifty dollars,
payable at the time of examination.
§1664.31. Application for installation, moving, or reinstallation of a boiler; fee
A. All boilers in this state shall be installed, moved, or reinstalled under the
supervision of a licensed installer and that licensed installer shall submit a signed
permit application to the fire marshal before the beginning of work. The application
shall list all of the following:
(1) The location of the boiler.
(2) The date installation is to be completed.
(3) The trade name of the boiler.
(4) The type of boiler.
(5) The manufacturer's and National Board's identifying number, and ASME
Stamp.
B. This application for permit to install, move, or reinstall a boiler shall be
accompanied by an installation permit fee of one hundred fifty dollars and shall be
signed by the licensed installer.
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 799 ENROLLED
§1664.32. Penalties
No boiler in this state shall be installed, moved, or reinstalled without a
permit issued to a licensed installer by the fire marshal or his designated
representative. Whoever fails to comply with the provisions of R.S. 40:1664.30 and
1664.31 may be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars per day.
§1664.33. Disposition of fees
All fees collected pursuant to this Subpart shall be used exclusively for the
operation and maintenance of the office of the state fire marshal.
Section 3. Part II of Chapter 1 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:41 through 49, and Part III of Chapter 5 of Title 23 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 23:531 through 546, are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.